Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,252
Regulatory authority, defined.

Regulatory authority shall mean the department or a political subdivision or state agency under contract with the department to perform regulatory functions authorized pursuant to the Nebraska Pure Food Act.

Laws 1981, LB 487, § 16;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-216.12;

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 21;

Laws 1999, LB 474, § 8.